Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.070

Chair, vice chair, chief clerk—Powers and duties of board and chief clerk—Meetings—Hearings—Counsel—Compensation.

The members of each boundary review board shall elect from its members a chair, vice chair, and shall employ a nonmember as chief clerk, who shall be the secretary of the board. The board shall determine its own rules and order of business and shall provide by resolution for the time and manner of holding all regular or special meetings: PROVIDED, That all meetings shall be subject to chapter 42.30 RCW. The board shall keep a journal of its proceedings which shall be a public record. A majority of all the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

The chief clerk of the board shall have the power to administer oaths and affirmations, certify to all official acts, issue subpoenas to any public officer or employee ordering him or her to testify before the board and produce public records, papers, books or documents. The chief clerk may invoke the aid of any court of competent jurisdiction to carry out such powers.

The board by rule may provide for hearings by panels of members consisting of not less than five board members, the number of hearing panels and members thereof, and for the impartial selection of panel members. A majority of a panel shall constitute a quorum thereof.

At the request of the board, the state attorney general, or at the board's option, the county prosecuting attorney, shall provide counsel for the board.

The planning departments of the county, other counties, and any city, and any state or regional planning agency shall furnish such information to the board at its request as may be reasonably necessary for the performance of its duties.

Each member of the board shall be compensated from the county current expense fund at the rate of fifty dollars per day, or a major portion thereof, for time actually devoted to the work of the boundary review board. Each board of county commissioners shall provide such funds as shall be necessary to pay the salaries of the members and staff, and such other expenses as shall be reasonably necessary.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4151; 1997 c 77 s 1; 1987 c 477 s 1; 1967 c 189 s 7.]